District of Columbia statutes.
10-1405

Savings provisions.

No provision of this subchapter shall be construed:

(1)

As an express or implied endorsement or approval by the Congress of any such construction, development, or operation of National Children’s Island;

(2)

Except as provided in § 10-1404, to exempt the recreational park and playground from the laws of the United States or the District, including laws relating to the environment, health, and safety; or

(3)

To prevent additional conditions on the National Children’s Island development or operation to mitigate adverse impacts on adjacent residential neighborhoods and park lands and the Anacostia River.

July 19, 1996, 110 Stat. 1420, Pub. L. 104-163, § 6

History